Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska77-27,108
Income tax; collection; comity with other states.

The courts of this state shall recognize and enforce liabilities for income taxes lawfully imposed by any other state which extends a like comity to this state, and the duly authorized office of any such state may sue for the collection of such a tax in the courts of this state. A certificate by the Secretary of State of such other state that an office suing for the collection of such a tax is duly authorized to collect the tax shall be conclusive proof of such authority. For the purpose of this section, the word taxes shall include additions to tax, interest and penalties. Liability for such taxes, additions to tax, interest and penalties shall be recognized and enforced by the courts of this state to the same extent that the laws of such other state permit the enforcement in its courts of liability for such taxes, additions to tax, interest and penalties due this state under the provisions of the Nebraska Revenue Act of 1967.

Laws 1967, c. 487, § 108, p. 1623.